Washington statutes.
RCW 15.44.040

Copies of records as evidence.

Copies of the proceedings, records and acts of the commission, when certified by the secretary, shall be admissible in any court and be prima facie evidence of the truth of the statements therein contained.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.44.040. Prior: 1959 c 163 s 9; prior: 1939 c 219 s 4, part; RRS s 6266-4, part.]